Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-163
Commission; rounding of amounts on returns or reports; authorized.

When the commission finds that the administration of the state alcohol excise tax laws might be more efficiently and economically conducted, the commission may require or allow for rounding of all amounts on returns or reports, including amounts of tax. Amounts shall be rounded to the nearest dollar with amounts ending in fifty cents or more rounded to the next highest dollar.

Laws 2007, LB578, § 2.